Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1232
Subpoena; disobedience; attachment; commitment; form; to whom directed.

Every attachment for the arrest or order of commitment to prison of a witness by a court or officer pursuant to sections 25-1230 and 25-1231 shall be under the seal of the court or officer, if he or she has an official seal, and shall specify particularly the cause of the arrest or commitment, and if the commitment is for refusing to answer a question, such question shall be stated in the order. Such order of commitment may be directed to the sheriff or coroner of the county where such witness resides or may be at the time and shall be executed by committing him or her to the jail of such county and delivering a copy of the order to the jailer.

R.S.1867, Code § 360, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 7924;

C.S.1922, § 8866;

C.S.1929, § 20-1232;

R.S.1943, § 25-1232;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 19.

Record of conviction of contempt by refusal to testify must state questions asked that witness refused to answer. Tastee Inn, Inc. v. Beatrice Foods Co., Inc., 167 Neb. 264, 92 N.W.2d 664 (1958).

When a witness is committed for contempt for refusing to testify, the questions asked and refused to be answered must be stated in the order of commitment. Wilcox v. State, 46 Neb. 402, 64 N.W. 1072 (1895).